Ohio, session 136, HB912.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 701.11 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 701.11. (A) The state and municipal government commission is created. The commission shall do all of the following: (1) Analyze and report on proposed state and municipal policies and rules that would impact municipal home rule authority; (2) Enhance collaborative opportunities between state and municipal leaders; (3) Make recommendations to state and municipal leaders on municipal authority, policy, and funding implications of proposed state policies; (4) Discuss and consider state and municipal government revenue sharing, grant programs, and other matters related to the fiscal health of municipal corporations. (B) The commission shall consist of the following thirteen members: (1) The director of development or the director's designee. (2) The following members appointed by the governor: (a) Two mayors, or their designees, of municipal corporations in the state with populations of sixty thousand or more; (b) Two mayors, or their designees, of municipal corporations in the state with populations of less than sixty thousand. (3) The following members appointed by the president of the senate: (a) One member of the general assembly; (b) One mayor, municipal executive, or charter county executive. (4) The following members appointed by the minority leader of the senate: (a) One member of the general assembly; (b) One mayor, municipal executive, or charter county executive. (5) The following members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives: (a) One member of the general assembly; (b) One mayor, municipal executive, or charter county executive. (6) The following members appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives: (a) One member of the general assembly; (b) One mayor, municipal executive, or charter county executive. (C) Each member shall serve a term of two years commencing on the thirtieth day of January of each odd-numbered year. (D) A vacancy on the commission shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment. Each member of the commission who is a member of the general assembly shall serve for the duration of the member's term or until that commission member is no longer a member of the senate or house of representatives. (E) Not later than the twenty-ninth day of January of each odd-numbered year, the commission shall prepare and submit a report to the general assembly detailing all of the following: (1) A summary of the commission's recommendation, along with subsequent actions taken or not taken by the general assembly and municipal governments, as appropriate; (2) A summary of legislation passed by the general assembly restricting or limiting home rule authority and any reported impacts on municipal law or policies; (3) Recommendations for the next general assembly to preserve and restore home rule authority and municipal authority. (F) The director of development or the director's designee shall serve as chairperson of the commission. A majority of members constitute a quorum. (G) The commission shall meet at the call of the chairperson at least biannually. The chairperson shall provide members with at least ten days' written notice of a meeting. The commission is subject to section 121.22 of the Revised Code. The Ohio government telecommunications service shall broadcast all meetings of the commission. The commission may allow experts or other parties to testify before the commission. (H) Members shall serve without compensation except to the extent that serving on the commission is considered part of the member's regular duties of employment. The commission shall reimburse each member for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the member's official duties. Membership on the commission shall not constitute holding another public office. (I) The commission shall not issue a recommendation or report without approval from at least all of the following: (1) A simple majority of total members; (2) Two members from each political party; (3) Two members who are members of the general assembly; (4) Two members who are a mayor, a mayor's designee, a municipal executive, or a charter county executive. (J) The commission may hire and supervise an executive director, who shall be located in the department of development, to administer the commission's duties. Section 2. The Governor, President and Minority Leader of the Senate, and Speaker and Minority Leader of the House of Representatives, in accordance with division (B) of section 701.11 of the Revised Code as enacted by this act, shall make initial appointments to the State and Municipal Government Commission not later than June 30, 2026. The initial members shall serve until their successors are appointed as specified in section 701.11 of the Revised Code as enacted by this act.